
DI28U−06

−DIAGNOSTICS ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI−319

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART
NOTICE:
When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.
HINT:
S Using SST 09843 −1 8020, connect the terminals Tc and E

1 , and remove the short pin.
S If any abnormality is not found when inspecting parts, inspect the ECU.
S If a malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed for that code. For de-

tails of each code, turn to the page referred to under the ”See page” for respective ”DTC No.” in the
DTC chart.

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

C0278 / 11
(DI−335)

Open or short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
SABSsolenoid rela y

C0279 / 12
(DI−335)

B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit

SABS solenoid relay
SABSsolenoid relaycircuit

C0226 /2 1
(DI−333)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SFRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFRRorSFRHcircuit

C0236 /22
(DI−333)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SFLcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFLRorSFLHcircuit

C0246 /23
(DI−333)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SRRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRHorSRRcircuit

C1225 /25
(DI−333)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SA1 circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA1 circuit

C1226 /26
(DI−333)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SA2circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA2circuit

C0200 /3 1*
1

(DI−325)
Right front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

C0205 /32*
1

(DI−325)
Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction SRight front, left front, right rearand left rearspeedsensor

E h d i i t
C0210 /33*

1

(DI−325)
Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

SEachspeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

C0215 /34*
1

(DI−325)
Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

C1237 /37
(DI−338)

Some tire is different size from the other tires STiresize

C1241 / 41
(DI−339)

Lowbatteryvoltageoropencircuit in IG 1 circuit
SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit

C1242 /42
(DI−343)

Open circuit in IG2 circuit
SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit

C1243 /43
(DI−347)

Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output)
SDecelerationsensor
SWireharness fordecelerationsensorsystem

C1244 /44
(DI−349)

Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit
SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit

C1245 /45
(DI−347)

Malfunction in deceleration sensor
SDecelerationsensor
SWireharness fordecelerationsensorsystem

C1248 /48
(DI−351)

SOpenorshort circuit in reardifferential lockcircuit
SReardifferential is locking

SRear differential lock



ECU

Powersouce*

Hydraulicbrakebooster

Motor relay circuit

Accumulator malfunction

Pumpmotorcircuit

Pressureswitch PH

PL

Pump motor

MTTwireharness

MT+ wire harness
MT− wireharness

MR1 opencircuit

MR2 open circuit

MR1 weldedcontact

MR2 welded contact

Pressure leaks

IG2opencircuit

Power supply circuit

Light Buzzer Light Light Light Light Light LightBuzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer

DTC

BRAKEwarning lightandbuzzer

42 5 1 52 53 54 56 57

*:When IG 1 circuit isopen,ABSwarning lightandBRAKEwarning lightcomeon.
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DI−320 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

LANDCRUISER(W/G) (RM6 16E)

C1249 /49
(DI−354)

Open circuit in stop light switch circuit SStop lightswitchcircuit

C1251 / 51*
2

(DI−359)
SPumpmotor is locked
SOpencircuit inpumpmotorground

SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotor

C1252 /52*
2

(DI−364)
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction

SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotor
SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotorcircuit
SPressureswitch (PHorPL)

C1253 /53*
2

(DI−371)
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction

SABSmotor relay
SABSmotor relaycircuit

C1254 /54*
2

(DI−377)
Pressure switch malfunction

SPressureswitch (PHorPL)
SPressureswitchcircuit

C1256 /56*
2

(DI−381)
Accumulator low pressure malfunction

SAccumulator
SPressureswitch (PHorPL)
SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotor

C1257 /57*
2

(DI−388)
Power supply drive circuit malfunction

SBattery
SPowerSourcecircuit
SABSECU

Always ON
(DI−392)

Malfunction in ABS ECU

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit
SABSECU

*
1
:As theDTCcannotbeerasedby replacingpartsalonedoeitherof the followingoperations.

(1) Clear DTC (See page DI−312) .
(2)At thevehiclespeedof20km/h ( 12mph),drive thevehicle for30secs.ormore.

*
2
: Using the following table, troubled parts can be specified.


